Louisiana, session 2026, HB296.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:5401(B)(1)(g) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§5401. District courts; reentry courts; subject matter
* * *
B. Participation in the workforce development sentencing program as
authorized by the provisions of this Section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(1) The court may recommend that a defendant participate in the workforce
development sentencing program if all of the following criteria are satisfied:
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 296 ENROLLED
(g) Other criminal proceedings alleging commission of a crime of violence
as defined in R.S. 14:2(B), except those listed in, shall not be pending against the
defendant.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 15:827(A)(introductory paragraph) and (9)(a), 828(D), and 1113(A)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§827. Duties of Department of Public Safety and Corrections
A. In addition to other duties imposed upon the department, it shall be the
duty of the department to do all of the following:
* * *
(9)(a) Establish a system to collect information and data on inmates
participating in any program that offers the inmate compensation for services or
work performed, on-the-job training, or industry certification, including but not
limited to information and data for all of the following:
(i) inmates Inmates assigned to Prison Enterprises' industrial, agricultural,
service, or other programs;.
(ii) inmates Inmates who are Certified Academic Tutors and Certified
Vocational Tutors;.
(iii) inmates Inmates assigned to a certified Private Sector/Prison Industry
Enhancement program; Certification Program.
(iv) inmates Inmates participating in a work release program established and
administered by a sheriff;.
(v) inmates Inmates participating in the work release program established
and administered by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections; and inmates
participating in a program established and administered pursuant to the Reentry
Advisory Council and Offender Rehabilitation Workforce Development Act.
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 296 ENROLLED
§828. Classification and treatment programs; qualified sex offender programs;
reports; earned credits
* * *
D. Offenders who are otherwise eligible under pursuant to this Section and
who are participating in the a workforce development work release program pursuant
to R.S. 15:1199.9, shall be eligible to earn an additional one hundred eighty days of
credit toward the reduction of the projected good time parole supervision date.
* * *
§1113. Facilities providing housing or temporary residence to individuals
participating in work release or workforce development work release
programs administered by the department
A. No facility that provides housing or temporary residence for individuals
who are participating in a work release programs program as authorized by the
provisions of R.S. 15:1111 or 1199.9 shall be located within one thousand feet of any
school or child day care center property.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 36:409(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§409. Transfer of agencies to Department of Public Safety and Corrections
A. The following agencies are task force to develop and implement an
electronic media system for lien recordation and title information (R.S. 32:707.2) is
placed within the Department of Public Safety and Corrections and shall exercise and
perform their its powers, duties, functions, and responsibilities as provided by law:.
(1) Reentry Advisory Council (R.S. 15:1199.4).
(2) Task force to develop and implement an electronic media system for lien
recordation and motor vehicle title information (R.S. 32:707.2).
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 47:287.750(A) and (B)(introductory paragraph), (2), and (4) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 296 ENROLLED
§287.750. Louisiana work opportunity tax credit
A. There is hereby authorized a nonrefundable credit for businesses that hire
participants in the work release programs provided for in R.S. 15:711, and 1111,
1199.9, and 1199.10.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
* * *
(2) "Eligible business" shall mean means a business that is subject to
Louisiana income tax and participates in any of the work release programs provided
for in R.S. 15:711, or 1111, 1199.9, or 1199.10.
* * *
(4) "Eligible re-entrant" shall mean means an inmate or former inmate who
is eligible to participate and is actively participating in a work release program
provided for in R.S. 15:711, or 1111, 1199.9, or 1199.10. An eligible re-entrant shall
meet all of the criteria provided for in R.S. 15:1199.7.
* * *
Section 5. R.S. 13:5401(B)(1)(a) and Part XVIII of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 15:1199.1 through 1199.16, are hereby repealed in their
entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.